Nebraska, session 109, LB303.
Be it enacted by the people of the State of Nebraska,
Section 1. (1) The School Financing Review Commission is created. The
commission shall consist of eighteen members, including:
(a) The Commissioner of Education or a designee of the Commissioner of
Education;
(b) The Property Tax Administrator or a designee of the Property Tax
Administrator;
(c) One representative of the Governor appointed by the Governor;
(d) Three members of the Legislature, who shall be nonvoting members of
the commission, including the Chairperson of the Education Committee of the
Legislature or the chairperson's designee, the Chairperson of the Revenue
Committee of the Legislature or the chairperson's designee, and one member
appointed pursuant to subsection (2) of this section. No more than two members
shall be affiliated with the same political party;
(e) One member who is a representative of postsecondary education with
expertise in school finance;
(f) Four members who are superintendents or school board members
representing a Class I, II, or III school district. There shall be at least one
member appointed pursuant to this subdivision (1)(f) representing each class of
school district. Of the members appointed pursuant to this subdivision (1)(f),
no more than two members shall represent the same class of school district, no
more than three members may be superintendents, and no more than three members
may be school board members;
(g) One member that is a representative of a Class IV school district and
one member that is a representative of a Class V school district. One member
appointed pursuant to this subdivision (1)(g) shall be a school board member of
the school district being represented and the other member appointed pursuant
to this subdivision (1)(g) shall be a school administrator in the other school
district being represented; and
(h) Five members appointed from the state at large, which shall include
(i) at least one individual having experience in business, (ii) at least one
individual having experience in farming, (iii) at least one individual teaching
as a certified teacher in a public school, and (iv) two other individuals.
Members appointed pursuant to subdivision (i) and (ii) of this subdivision (1)
(h) may be retired.
(2)(a) The member to be appointed as described in subdivision (1)(d) of
this section shall be appointed by the Executive Board of the Legislative
Council in January of each odd-numbered year for a two-year term, except that
the initial member shall be appointed within thirty days after the effective
date of this act and shall serve until a successor is appointed in January
2027.
(b) The members described in subdivisions (1)(a) through (c) of this
section shall serve as ex officio members of the commission.
(3) The members described in subdivisions (1)(e) through (h) of this
section shall be appointed by the Governor within thirty days after the
effective date of this act. Initial appointees under this subsection shall
serve terms as described in subsection (4) of this section. Thereafter, such
members shall serve terms of three years, and any vacancy shall be filled by
the Governor for the remainder of the vacated term. For purposes of determining
term length and expiration of such terms, the initial terms for such members
shall begin thirty days after the effective date of this act.
(4)(a) The initial terms for members described in subdivisions (1)(e)
through (h) of this section shall be as follows:
(i) The member appointed pursuant to subdivision (1)(e) of this section,
one member described in subdivision (1)(g) of this section, and one member
described in subdivision (1)(h) of this section shall serve a three-year term;
(ii) Two members described in subdivision (1)(f) of this section, one
member described in subdivision (1)(g) of this section, and one member
described in subdivision (1)(h) shall serve an initial term of two years; and
(iii) Two members described in subdivision (1)(f) of this section and
three members described in subdivision (1)(h) of this section shall serve an
initial term of one year.
(b) The Governor shall, upon appointment, designate the initial term for
the members appointed subject to subdivision (4)(a) of this section.
-1-

LB303 LB303
2025 2025
(5) If at any point a member no longer meets the qualification for such
member's position on the commission, such member shall vacate membership on the
commission. Any vacancy in the commission shall be filled in the same manner
and same qualification as the original appointment.
(6) A member of the commission appointed pursuant to subsection (3) of
this section shall not receive any compensation for services as a member but
shall be reimbursed for expenses incurred as a member of the commission as
provided in sections 81-1174 to 81-1177.
(7) The Commissioner of Education or the designee of the Commissioner of
Education shall be the chairperson of the commission, and the commission shall
elect a vice-chairperson from among its members.
(8) The commission shall meet at least four times a year and at least once
per calendar quarter.
(9) The State Department of Education may provide staff to assist the
commission as needed and requested by the chairperson of the commission in
accordance with guidelines developed by the commission. The commission may also
obtain assistance from the State Department of Education, the Department of
Revenue, and the Legislative Fiscal Analyst in acquiring the data needed to
carry out its duties.
(10) For administrative purposes, the commission shall be housed within
the State Department of Education.
Sec. 2. (1)(a) The purpose of the School Financing Review Commission is
to study and provide advisory recommendations relating to school funding in
Nebraska. The commission shall:
(i) Evaluate the school funding formula for education under the Tax Equity
and Educational Opportunities Support Act and make recommendations for
adjustments or changes to such formula that may be necessary to help prevent
the increase of property taxes;
(ii) Regularly review the resources side of the formula under the Tax
Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act;
(iii) Regularly review the needs side of the formula under the Tax Equity
and Educational Opportunities Support Act;
(iv) Analyze options for how to minimize the negative impact on schools
during times when the state may be unable to fully fund the formula under the
Tax Equity and Educational Opportunities Support Act;
(v) Analyze the impact of funding for education on student achievement and
outcomes, focusing on, but not limited to: Access to early childhood education;
student attendance; literacy; graduation rate; college-going rate; and
postsecondary workforce participation; and
(vi) Analyze the impact of funding for education on issues and resources
impacting students with relatively high needs, including, but not limited to,
students who live in areas of high concentrations of poverty, students with an
individualized education program, and students with limited English
proficiency.
(b) The School Financing Review Commission, to the extent it is practical,
shall compare findings from subdivision (1)(a) of this section to similar
policies from other states.
(2) By December 1, 2025, and by November 1 of each year thereafter, the
commission shall prepare and electronically deliver to the Clerk of the
Legislature an annual report with the observations and recommendations
developed pursuant to subsection (1) of this section.
Sec. 3. Section 79-1028.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska, is
amended to read:
79-1028.01 (1) For each school fiscal year, a school district may exceed
its budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures as calculated
pursuant to section 79-1023 for such school fiscal year by a specific dollar
amount for the following exclusions:
(a) Expenditures for repairs to infrastructure damaged by a natural
disaster which is declared a disaster emergency pursuant to the Emergency
Management Act;
(b) Expenditures for judgments, except judgments or orders from the
Commission of Industrial Relations, obtained against a school district which
require or obligate a school district to pay such judgment, to the extent such
judgment is not paid by liability insurance coverage of a school district;
(c) Expenditures pursuant to the Retirement Incentive Plan authorized in
section 79-855 or the Staff Development Assistance authorized in section
79-856;
(d) Expenditures of amounts received from educational entities as defined
in section 79-1201.01 for providing distance education courses through the
Educational Service Unit Coordinating Council to such educational entities;
(e)(i) (e) Expenditures to pay for employer contributions pursuant to
subsection (2) of section 79-958 to the School Employees Retirement System of
the State of Nebraska to the extent that such expenditures exceed the employer
contributions under such subsection that would have been made at a contribution
rate of seven and thirty-five hundredths percent. ;
(ii) For school fiscal years 2025-26 and 2026-27, the amount of the
expenditures described in subdivision (1)(e)(i) of this section for school
fiscal year 2024-25 may be carried over and included in the budget authority
for the general fund budget of expenditures for school fiscal years 2025-26 and
2026-27;
(f) Expenditures to pay for school district contributions pursuant to
subdivision (1)(c)(i) or (1)(d)(i) of section 79-9,113 to the retirement system
established pursuant to the Class V School Employees Retirement Act to the
-2-

LB303 LB303
2025 2025
extent that such expenditures exceed the school district contributions under
such subdivision that would have been made at a contribution rate of seven and
thirty-seven hundredths percent;
(g) Expenditures for incentives agreed to be paid by a school district to
certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of employment
occurring prior to July 1, 2009, occurring on or after the last day of the
2010-11 school year and prior to the first day of the 2013-14 school year, or,
to the extent that a district demonstrates to the State Board of Education
pursuant to subsection (3) of this section that the agreement will result in a
net savings in salary and benefit costs to the school district over a five-year
period, occurring on or after the first day of the 2013-14 school year and
prior to September 1, 2017;
(h) Expenditures by a school district with budgeted expenditures otherwise
equal to the budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures for
such school district as calculated pursuant to section 79-1023 for such school
fiscal year for current and future qualified voluntary termination incentives
for certificated teachers pursuant to subsection (3) of section 79-8,142 that
are not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to this subsection;
(i) Expenditures by a school district with budgeted expenditures otherwise
equal to the budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures for
such school district as calculated pursuant to section 79-1023 for such school
fiscal year for seventy-five percent of incentives agreed to be paid to
certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of employment
occurring between September 1, 2017, and August 31, 2018, as a result of a
collective-bargaining agreement in force and effect on September 1, 2017, that
are not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to this subsection;
(j) Expenditures by a school district with budgeted expenditures otherwise
equal to the budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures for
such school district as calculated pursuant to section 79-1023 for such school
fiscal year for fifty percent of incentives agreed to be paid to certificated
employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of employment occurring
between September 1, 2018, and August 31, 2019, as a result of a collective-
bargaining agreement in force and effect on September 1, 2017, that are not
otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to this subsection;
(k) Expenditures by a school district with budgeted expenditures otherwise
equal to the budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures for
such school district as calculated pursuant to section 79-1023 for such school
fiscal year for twenty-five percent of incentives agreed to be paid to
certificated employees in exchange for a voluntary termination of employment
occurring between September 1, 2019, and August 31, 2020, as a result of a
collective-bargaining agreement in force and effect on September 1, 2017, that
are not otherwise included in an exclusion pursuant to this subsection;
(l) The special education budget of expenditures;
(m) Expenditures of special grant funds; and
(n) Expenditures of funds received as federal impact aid pursuant to 20
U.S.C. 7701 to 7714, as such sections existed on January 1, 2016, due to a
district having land within its boundaries that is federal property classified
as Indian lands under 20 U.S.C. 7713(7), as such section existed on January 1,
2016, and funds received as impact aid due to children in attendance who
resided on Indian lands in accordance with 20 U.S.C. 7703(a)(1)(C), as such
section existed on January 1, 2016.
(2) For each school fiscal year, a school district may exceed its budget
authority for the general fund budget of expenditures as calculated pursuant to
section 79-1023 for such school fiscal year by a specific dollar amount and
include such dollar amount in the budget of expenditures used to calculate
budget authority for the general fund budget of expenditures pursuant to
section 79-1023 for future years for the following exclusions:
(a) The first school fiscal year the district will be participating in
Network Nebraska for the full school fiscal year, for the difference of the
estimated expenditures for such school fiscal year for telecommunications
services, access to data transmission networks that transmit data to and from
the school district, and the transmission of data on such networks as such
expenditures are defined by the department for purposes of the distance
education and telecommunications allowance minus the dollar amount of such
expenditures for the second school fiscal year preceding the first full school
fiscal year the district participates in Network Nebraska;
(b) Expenditures for new elementary attendance sites in the first year of
operation or the first year of operation after being closed for at least one
school year if such elementary attendance site will most likely qualify for the
elementary site allowance in the immediately following school fiscal year as
determined by the state board;
(c) For the first school fiscal year for which early childhood education
membership is included in formula students for the calculation of state aid,
expenditures for early childhood education equal to the amount the school
district received in early childhood education grants pursuant to section
79-1103 for the prior school fiscal year, increased by the basic allowable
growth rate; and
(d) For school fiscal year 2013-14, an amount not to exceed two percent
over the previous school year if such increase is approved by a seventy-five
percent majority vote of the school board of such district.
(3) The state board shall approve, deny, or modify the amount allowed for
any exclusions to the budget authority for the general fund budget of
expenditures pursuant to this section.
-3-

LB303 LB303
2025 2025
Sec. 4. Original section 79-1028.01, Reissue Revised Statutes of
Nebraska, is repealed.
Sec. 5. Since an emergency exists, this act takes effect when passed and
approved according to law.
-4-